Illinois, session 104th, HB3541.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Energy Transition Act is amended by 5changing Section 5-40 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 730/5-40)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 15, 2045)8    Sec. 5-40. Illinois Climate Works Preapprenticeship 9Program. 10    (a) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall 11develop, and through Regional Administrators administer, the 12Illinois Climate Works Preapprenticeship Program. The goal of 13the Illinois Climate Works Preapprenticeship Program is to 14create a network of hubs throughout the State that will 15recruit, prescreen, and provide preapprenticeship skills 16training, for which participants may attend free of charge and 17receive a stipend, to create a qualified, diverse pipeline of 18workers who are prepared for careers in the construction and 19building trades and clean energy jobs opportunities therein. 20Upon completion of the Illinois Climate Works 21Preapprenticeship Program, the candidates will be connected to 22and prepared to successfully complete an apprenticeship 23program.  HB3541 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11392 HLH 21480 b1    (b) Each Climate Works Hub that receives funding from the 2Energy Transition Assistance Fund shall provide an annual 3report to the Illinois Works Review Panel by April 1 of each 4calendar year. The annual report shall include the following 5information:6        (1) a description of the Climate Works Hub's 7    recruitment, screening, and training efforts, including a 8    description of training related to construction and 9    building trades opportunities in clean energy jobs;10        (2) the number of individuals who apply to, 11    participate in, and complete the Climate Works Hub's 12    program, broken down by race, gender, age, and veteran 13    status;14        (3) the number of the individuals referenced in 15    paragraph (2) of this subsection who are initially 16    accepted and placed into apprenticeship programs in the 17    construction and building trades; and18        (4) the number of individuals referenced in paragraph 19    (2) of this subsection who remain in apprenticeship 20    programs in the construction and building trades or have 21    become journeymen one calendar year after their placement, 22    as referenced in paragraph (3) of this subsection.23    (c) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall provide 24funding to 3 Climate Works Hubs throughout the State, 25including one to the Illinois Department of Transportation 26Region 1, one to the Illinois Department of Transportation   HB3541 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 11392 HLH 21480 b1Regions 2 and 3, and one to the Illinois Department of 2Transportation Regions 4 and 5. An eligible organization may 3serve as the designated Climate Works Hub for all 5 regions. 4Climate Works Hubs shall be awarded grants in multi-year 5increments not to exceed 36 months. Each grant shall come with 6a one year initial term, with the Department renewing each 7year for 2 additional years unless the grantee either declines 8to continue or fails to meet reasonable performance measures 9that consider apprenticeship programs timeframes. The 10Department may take into account experience and performance as 11a previous grantee of the Climate Works Hub as part of the 12selection criteria for subsequent years. 13    (d) Each Climate Works Hub that receives funding from the 14Energy Transition Assistance Fund shall recruit, prescreen, 15and provide preapprenticeship training to program 16participants. Each Climate Works Hub that receives funding 17from the Energy Transition Assistance Fund shall:18        (1) in each Hub Site where the applicant pool allows:19            (A) dedicate at least one-third of Program 20        placements to applicants who reside in a geographic 21        area that is impacted by economic and environmental 22        challenges, defined as an area that is both (i) an R3 23        Area, as defined pursuant to Section 10-40 of the 24        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act, and (ii) an 25        environmental justice community, as defined by the 26        Illinois Power Agency under the Illinois Power Agency   HB3541 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 11392 HLH 21480 b1        Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators used by 2        the Agency unless and until the constitutional basis 3        for the inclusion of the factors in determining 4        Program admissions is established; among applicants 5        that satisfy these criteria, preference shall be given 6        to applicants who face barriers to employment, 7        including low educational attainment, prior 8        involvement with the criminal justice system, and 9        language barriers, and applicants that are graduates 10        of or currently enrolled in the foster care system; 11        and12            (B) dedicate at least two-thirds of Program 13        placements to applicants who reside in a geographic 14        area that is impacted by economic or environmental 15        challenges, defined as an area that is either (i) an R3 16        Area, as defined pursuant to Section 10-40 of the 17        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act, or (ii) an 18        environmental justice community, as defined by the 19        Illinois Power Agency in the Illinois Power Agency 20        Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators used by 21        the Agency unless and until the constitutional basis 22        for the inclusion of the factors in determining 23        Program admissions is established; among applicants 24        that satisfy these criteria, preference shall be given 25        to applicants who face barriers to employment, 26        including low educational attainment, prior   HB3541 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 11392 HLH 21480 b1        involvement with the criminal legal system, and 2        language barriers, and applicants that are graduates 3        of or currently enrolled in the foster care system; 4        and5            (C) prioritize the remaining Program placements 6        for the following:7                (i) applicants who are displaced energy 8            workers, as defined in the Energy Community 9            Reinvestment Act;10                (ii) persons who face barriers to employment, 11            including low educational attainment, prior 12            involvement with the criminal justice system, and 13            language barriers; and14                (iii) applicants who are graduates of or 15            currently enrolled in the foster care system, 16            regardless of the applicant's area of residence; 17            Each Climate Works Hub that receives funding from 18            the Energy Transition Assistance Fund shall:19        (1) recruit, prescreen, and provide preapprenticeship 20    training to equity investment eligible persons;21        (2) provide training information related to 22    opportunities and certifications relevant to clean energy 23    jobs in the construction and building trades; and24        (3) provide preapprentices with stipends they receive 25    that may vary depending on the occupation the individual 26    is training for.   HB3541 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 11392 HLH 21480 b1    (d-5) Priority shall be given to Climate Works Hubs that 2have an agreement with North American Building Trades Unions 3(NABTU) to utilize the Multi-Craft Core Curriculum or 4successor curriculums. 5    (e) Funding for the Program is subject to appropriation 6from the Energy Transition Assistance Fund.7    (f) The Department shall adopt any rules deemed necessary 8to implement this Section.9(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-1031, eff. 5-27-22; 10102-1123, eff. 1-27-23.) 11    Section 10. The Illinois Works Jobs Program Act is amended 12by changing Section 20-15 as follows: 13    (30 ILCS 559/20-15)14    Sec. 20-15. Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program; 15Illinois Works Bid Credit Program. 16    (a) The Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program is 17established and shall be administered by the Department. The 18goal of the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program is to 19create a network of community-based organizations throughout 20the State that will recruit, prescreen, and provide 21preapprenticeship skills training, for which participants may 22attend free of charge and receive a stipend, to create a 23qualified, diverse pipeline of workers who are prepared for 24careers in the construction and building trades. Upon   HB3541 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 11392 HLH 21480 b1completion of the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program, 2the candidates will be skilled and work-ready. 3    (b) There is created the Illinois Works Fund, a special 4fund in the State treasury. The Illinois Works Fund shall be 5administered by the Department. The Illinois Works Fund shall 6be used to provide funding for community-based organizations 7throughout the State. In addition to any other transfers that 8may be provided for by law, on and after July 1, 2019 at the 9direction of the Director of the Governor's Office of 10Management and Budget, the State Comptroller shall direct and 11the State Treasurer shall transfer amounts not exceeding a 12total of $50,000,000 from the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund 13to the Illinois Works Fund.14    (b-5) In addition to any other transfers that may be 15provided for by law, beginning July 1, 2024 and each July 1 16thereafter, or as soon thereafter as practical, the State 17Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall 18transfer $20,000,000 from the Capital Projects Fund to the 19Illinois Works Fund. 20    (c) Each community-based organization that receives 21funding from the Illinois Works Fund shall provide an annual 22report to the Illinois Works Review Panel by April 1 of each 23calendar year. The annual report shall include the following 24information: 25        (1) a description of the community-based 26    organization's recruitment, screening, and training   HB3541 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 11392 HLH 21480 b1    efforts; 2        (2) the number of individuals who apply to, 3    participate in, and complete the community-based 4    organization's program, broken down by race, gender, age, 5    and veteran status; and6    (3) the number of the individuals referenced in item (2) 7    of this subsection who are initially accepted and placed 8    into apprenticeship programs in the construction and 9    building trades. 10    (d) The Department shall create and administer the 11Illinois Works Bid Credit Program that shall provide economic 12incentives, through bid credits, to encourage contractors and 13subcontractors to provide contracting and employment 14opportunities to historically underrepresented populations in 15the construction industry. 16    The Illinois Works Bid Credit Program shall allow 17contractors and subcontractors to earn bid credits for use 18toward future bids for public works projects contracted by the 19State or an agency of the State in order to increase the 20chances that the contractor and the subcontractors will be 21selected.22    Contractors or subcontractors may be eligible to earn bid 23credits for employing apprentices who have completed the 24Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program, the Climate Works 25Preapprenticeship Program, or the Highway Construction Careers 26Training Program. Contractors or subcontractors shall earn bid   HB3541 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 11392 HLH 21480 b1credits at a rate established by the Department and based on 2labor hours worked by apprentices who have completed the 3Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program, the Climate Works 4Preapprenticeship Program, or the Highway Construction Careers 5Training Program. In order to earn bid credits, contractors 6and subcontractors shall provide the Department with certified 7payroll documenting the hours performed by apprentices who 8have completed the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program, 9the Climate Works Preapprenticeship Program, or the Highway 10Construction Careers Training Program. Contractors and 11subcontractors can use bid credits toward future bids for 12public works projects contracted or funded by the State or an 13agency of the State in order to increase the likelihood of 14being selected as the contractor for the public works project 15toward which they have applied the bid credit. The Department 16shall establish the rate by rule and shall publish it on the 17Department's website. The rule may include maximum bid credits 18allowed per contractor, per subcontractor, per apprentice, per 19bid, or per year. 20    The Illinois Works Credit Bank is hereby created and shall 21be administered by the Department. The Illinois Works Credit 22Bank shall track the bid credits. 23    A contractor or subcontractor who has been awarded bid 24credits under any other State program for employing 25apprentices who have completed the Illinois Works 26Preapprenticeship Program is not eligible to receive bid   HB3541 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 11392 HLH 21480 b1credits under the Illinois Works Bid Credit Program relating 2to the same contract.3    The Department shall report to the Illinois Works Review 4Panel the following: (i) the number of bid credits awarded by 5the Department; (ii) the number of bid credits submitted by 6the contractor or subcontractor to the agency administering 7the public works contract; and (iii) the number of bid credits 8accepted by the agency for such contract. Any agency that 9awards bid credits pursuant to the Illinois Works Credit Bank 10Program shall report to the Department the number of bid 11credits it accepted for the public works contract.12    Upon a finding that a contractor or subcontractor has 13reported falsified records to the Department in order to 14fraudulently obtain bid credits, the Department may bar the 15contractor or subcontractor from participating in the Illinois 16Works Bid Credit Program and may suspend the contractor or 17subcontractor from bidding on or participating in any public 18works project. False or fraudulent claims for payment relating 19to false bid credits may be subject to damages and penalties 20under applicable law. 21    (e) The Department shall adopt any rules deemed necessary 22to implement this Section. In order to provide for the 23expeditious and timely implementation of this Act, the 24Department may adopt emergency rules. The adoption of 25emergency rules authorized by this subsection is deemed to be 26necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.  HB3541 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 11392 HLH 21480 b1(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-305, eff. 7-28-23; 2103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)